src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON GUOKTELOGIVIHTTA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Nom:e#logi#vihtta           K                ;
             vihtta+Num+Ess:e#logi#vihtta%>n        K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Acc:e#logi#vihtta           K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Gen:e#logi#viđa             K                ;
       vihtta+Num+Cmp/SgGen:e#logi#viđa             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc:e#logi#viđa%>s          K                ;
 vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e#logi#viđa%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill:e#logi#vihtti%>j        K                ;
     vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#logi#viđa             K                ;
     vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#logi#viđa             K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Nom:e#logi#viđa%>t          K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Acc:e#logi#viđa%>X5jd       K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Gen:e#logi#viđa%>X5jd       K                ;
     vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e#logi#viđa%>X5jd       K                ;
     vihtta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e#logi#viđa%>X5jd       K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill:e#logi#viđa%>jde        K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Com:e#logi#viđa%>guin       K                ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGIVIHTTA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Nom:htta#logi#vihtta       K                ;
             vihtta+Num+Ess:htta#logi#vihtta%>n    K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Acc:htta#logi#vihtta       K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Gen:htta#logi#viđa         K                ;
       vihtta+Num+Cmp/SgGen:htta#logi#viđa         NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc:htta#logi#viđa%>s      K                ;
 vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:htta#logi#viđa%>n      K                ; ! !SOUTH
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill:htta#logi#vihtti%>j    K                ;
     vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#viđa         K                ;
     vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#logi#viđa         K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Nom:htta#logi#viđa%>t      K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Acc:htta#logi#viđa%>X5jd   K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Gen:htta#logi#viđa%>X5jd   K                ;
     vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#viđa%>X5jd   K                ;
     vihtta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:htta#logi#viđa%>X5jd   K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill:htta#logi#viđa%>jde    K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K                ;
          vihtta+Num+Pl+Com:htta#logi#viđa%>jguin  K                ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGIGUHTTA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Nom:#logi#guhtta           K                ;
             guhtta+Num+Ess:#logi#guhtta%>n        K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#guhtta           K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#guđa             K                ;
       guhtta+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#guđa             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#guđa%>s          K                ;
 guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#guđa%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#guhtti%>j        K                ;
     guhtta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#guđa             K                ;
     guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#guđa             K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#guđa%>t          K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#guđa%>X5jd       K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#guđa%>X5jd       K                ;
     guhtta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#guđa%>X5jd       K                ;
     guhtta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#guđa%>X5jd       K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#guđa%>jde        K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#guđa%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGIGUHTTA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#guhtta       K                ;
             guhtta+Num+Ess:#logi#guhtta%>n        K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#guhtta           K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#guđa             K                ;
       guhtta+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#guđa             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#guđa%>s          K                ;
 guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#guđa%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#guhtti%>j        K                ;
     guhtta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#guđa             K                ;
     guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#guđa             K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#guđa%>t          K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#guđa%>X5jd       K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#guđa%>X5jd       K                ;
     guhtta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#guđa%>X5jd       K                ;
     guhtta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#guđa%>X5jd       K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#guđa%>jde        K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#guđa%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON GUOKTELOGIGUHTTA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Nom:e#logi#guhtta           K                ;
             guhtta+Num+Ess:e#logi#guhtta%>n        K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Acc:e#logi#guhtta           K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Gen:e#logi#guđa             K                ;
       guhtta+Num+Cmp/SgGen:e#logi#guđa             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc:e#logi#guđa%>s          K                ;
 guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e#logi#guđa%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Ill:e#logi#guhtti%>j        K                ;
     guhtta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#logi#guđa             K                ;
     guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#logi#guđa             K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Nom:e#logi#guđa%>t          K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Acc:e#logi#guđa%>X5jd       K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Gen:e#logi#guđa%>X5jd       K                ;
     guhtta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e#logi#guđa%>X5jd       K                ;
     guhtta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e#logi#guđa%>X5jd       K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Ill:e#logi#guđa%>jde        K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K                ;
          guhtta+Num+Pl+Com:e#logi#guđa%>guin       K                ;

LEXICON 21TO99   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
   guoktelogi:guokºt         GUOKTELOGIVIHTTA   ;
   guoktelogi:guokºt         GUOKTELOGIGUHTTA   ;
   golbmalogi:golbma         GOLBMALOGIGUHTTA   ;
 njealljelogi:njeallj        GUOKTELOGIVIHTTA   ;
 njealljelogi:njeallj        GUOKTELOGIGUHTTA   ;
   vihttalogi:vi             VIHTTALOGIVIHTTA   ;
   guhttalogi:gu             VIHTTALOGIVIHTTA   ;
    čiežalogi:čieža          GOLBMALOGIGUHTTA   ;
    giežalogi:gieža          GOLBMALOGIGUHTTA   ;
   gávccilogi:gávcci         GAVCCILOGIGUHTTA   ;
    gákcilogi:gákci          GAVCCILOGIGUHTTA   ;
    ovccilogi:ovcci          GAVCCILOGIGUHTTA   ;
